Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5154.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1290. (1) If a public high school or middle school charges a fee for admission to an interscholastic athletic activity event offered by the public high school or middle school, the board of the school district or intermediate school district or board of directors of the public school academy that operates the high school or middle school shall ensure that cash is an acceptable form of payment for the fee. (2) As used in this section: (a) "High school" means a school that offers at least 1 of grades 9 to 12. (b) "Middle school" means a school that offers at least 1 of grades 6 to 8.